Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-924
Municipal planning; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 19-924 to 19-933:

(1) Municipality or municipal shall mean or relate to cities of the first and second classes and villages;

(2) Mayor shall mean the chief executive of the municipality, whether the official designation of the office is mayor, chairperson, city manager, or otherwise; and

(3) Council shall mean the chief legislative body of the municipality.

Laws 1937, c. 39, § 1, p. 176;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2101;

R.S.1943, § 18-1301;

Laws 1967, c. 85, § 1, p. 269;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1301;

Laws 1993, LB 207, § 1.

Zoning for counties and municipalities are governed by different statutes, and the provisions to eliminate overlapping refer to municipalities only. Seward County Board of Commissioners v. City of Seward, 196 Neb. 266, 242 N.W.2d 849 (1976).

City of first class has authority to carry out municipal planning. City of Grand Island v. Ehlers, 180 Neb. 331, 142 N.W.2d 770 (1966).